Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 50 Commission on Medical Cannabis

31-50-1 through 31-50-5.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 3-1/HB 1, effective June 30, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter, consisting of Code Sections 31-50-1 through 31-50-5, and relating to the Commission on Medical Cannabis, was based on Ga. L. 2015, p. 49, § 3-1/HB 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, designated this Code section as reserved.